Maryland, session 2025, HB0678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
23–109.
(a) The State Library Agency shall establish the Deaf Culture Digital Library as
the primary information center on deaf resources for library customers and staff in the
State.
(b) The Deaf Culture Digital Library shall:
(1) Conduct a needs assessment to identify gaps in library services for deaf
patrons and to implement strategies to fill the gaps and better coordinate library services
for the deaf;
(2) In coordination with the Governor’s Office of the Deaf and Hard of
Hearing, develop and provide sensitivity training for State and county library staff to help
them better understand deaf patrons and their needs;
(3) Develop a website that will allow for information sharing and
coordination between the Deaf Culture Digital Library and county library systems;
(4) In coordination with the State Library Agency, develop deaf–related
programs and materials and share them with county library systems and other libraries in
the State;
– 1 –

Ch. 325 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) Develop partnerships and strategic alliances with other entities,
including:
(i) The Governor’s Office of the Deaf and Hard of Hearing;
(ii) County library systems;
(iii) The State Library Agency;
(iv) Veterans’ groups;
(v) State and local arts councils;
(vi) Senior citizens organizations; and
(vii) Deaf and hard of hearing organizations, including:
1. The National Association of the Deaf;
2. The Hearing Loss Association of America; and
3. The Maryland Association of the Deaf;
(6) Encourage partnerships and collaborations with information service
providers to help provide virtual access to information and research;
(7) Form a Deaf Culture Digital Library Advisory Board to provide advice
on initiatives that further advance the mission and goals of the Deaf Culture Digital
Library and the majority of whose members are deaf or hard of hearing and selected from
the following entities:
(i) County library systems;
(ii) The State Library Agency;
(iii) The Governor’s Office of the Deaf and Hard of Hearing;
(iv) Statewide deaf and hard of hearing organizations; and
(v) Other organizations as agreed on by the Governor’s Office of the
Deaf and Hard of Hearing and the State Library Agency; and
(8) Establish a Deaf Culture Digital Library “Friends of the Library” group
composed of individuals who are strongly committed, well–positioned, and able to promote
community involvement, advocacy, and funding for the Deaf Culture Digital Library.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 325
(c) The lead employee or coordinator who manages the Deaf Culture Digital
Library shall be:
(1) A deaf or hard of hearing individual; and
(2) Knowledgeable and experienced concerning issues affecting deaf and
hard of hearing individuals.
(D) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$450,000 TO THE DEAF CULTURE DIGITAL LIBRARY.
(E) THE DEAF CULTURE DIGITAL LIBRARY SHALL SUBMIT ITS ANNUAL
OPERATING BUDGET TO THE STATE LIBRARY AGENCY ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1 EACH
YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –